Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 2. Planning.

Sec. 19.10.110.
Traffic surveys, plans, and recommendations.

The department may collect, analyze, and interpret physical and economic data needed to measure existing and estimated future highway characteristics such as origin and destination, volumes, speeds, accidents, congestion, parking, pedestrian use of highways, and the economic loss caused by inferior traffic facilities, including the preparation of traffic plans and recommendations.

History.

(§ 5 art IV title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Highways, Streets and Bridges, §§ 32 et seq., 103 et seq.

40 C.J.S., Highways, § 175 et seq.

Liability of governmental entity or public officer for personal injury or damages arising out of vehicular accident due to negligent or defective design of highway. 45 ALR3d 875; 58 ALR4th 559.

Sec. 19.10.120.
Research on highway development.

The department may gather, investigate, and compile information concerning the use, construction, and maintenance of highways, the practices and methods of efficient highway organization, financing, and other information, data and statistics of the state and the extent of the natural resources of road-building materials in the state.
The department may enter into agreements with states, municipalities, or research organizations to carry on research and test projects involving highway development.
The department may disseminate this information, together with recommendations it considers advisable.

History.

(§ 4 art IV title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 19.10.130.
Inspection and testing of materials and equipment.

The department may inspect and test materials, supplies, equipment, and machinery used by it or by a contractor constructing or maintaining highways in the state, and develop methods and procedures for this inspection and testing.

History.

(§ 6 art IV title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Sec. 19.10.140.
Long-range program for highway construction and maintenance. [Repealed, § 7 ch 39 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 19.10.150.
Construction program.

Before February 2 of each year, the department shall prepare a statement showing what construction work has been requested and proposed and may be undertaken by the department.
The statement must set forth a general itemization of the estimated cost for each project and the total estimates of all projects. The department shall adopt a construction program which must include the projects to be undertaken by it during the following construction season and must establish project priorities.
The department may increase, decrease, amend, or revise the construction program from time to time as circumstances warrant.

History.

(§ 3 art IV title II ch 152 SLA 1957)

Cross references. —

For responsibility of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for state transportation planning, see AS

44.42.050

.

Sec. 19.10.160.
Standard plans and specifications; planning for future traffic.

The department shall prepare and adopt uniform standard plans and specifications for the establishment, construction, and maintenance of highways in the state. The department may amend the plans and specifications as it considers advisable. The standards must conform as closely as practicable to those adopted by the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials.

Design for proposed major upgrade and new construction projects for highways in federally recognized metropolitan planning areas must be conducive to safety, durability, and economy of maintenance, and provide for capacity that will adequately serve planned future traffic as set out in this subsection. This subsection does not apply to designs for highway maintenance projects. Proposed major upgrade and new construction projects that are estimated to cost

less than $5,000,000 must be designed to adequately serve planned future traffic for at least the next 10 years;

$5,000,000 or more must be designed to adequately serve planned future traffic for at least the next 20 years.

History.

(§ 1 art IV title II ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 12 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For responsibility of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for state transportation planning, see AS

44.42.050

.